bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="से/__future">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अबV</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अबV</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इहन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="m" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अबु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p1" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अबु</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इहँइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इहन</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="f" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इहंइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="hon" />
            <s n="sg" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इहंइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="hon" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p2" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खा/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इबे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कर/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बे</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ले/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हो/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="प/ी__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िबइ</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="eo" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छू/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उठ/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सो/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="से/__future_eo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बइ</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="eo" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खा/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इबो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कर/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ले/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हो/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="प/ी__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िबो</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /><s n="ea" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छू/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उठ/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>बो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सो/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अबो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="से/__future_ea">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अबो</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
            <s n="ea" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="खा/__gerund_ba">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="कर/__gerund_ba">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उठ/__gerund_ba">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हो/__gerund_ba">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>इब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="प/ी__gerund_ba">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िअब</l>
          <r>ी<s n="v" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छ/ू__gerund_ba">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ुअब</l>
          <r>ू<s n="v" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सो/__gerund_ba">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>अब</l>
          <r>
            <s n="v" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="से">
      <i>से</i>
      <par n="से/__future" />
    </e>
    <e lm="खा">
      <i>खा</i>
      <par n="खा/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कर">
      <i>कर</i>
      <par n="कर/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ले">
      <i>ले</i>
      <par n="ले/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हो">
      <i>हो</i>
      <par n="हो/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="प">
      <i>प</i>
      <par n="प/ी__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="छू">
      <i>छू</i>
      <par n="छू/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="उठ">
      <i>उठ</i>
      <par n="उठ/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सो">
      <i>सो</i>
      <par n="सो/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="से">
      <i>से</i>
      <par n="से/__future_eo" />
    </e>
    <e lm="खा">
      <i>खा</i>
      <par n="खा/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कर">
      <i>कर</i>
      <par n="कर/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="ले">
      <i>ले</i>
      <par n="ले/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हो">
      <i>हो</i>
      <par n="हो/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="प">
      <i>प</i>
      <par n="प/ी__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="छू">
      <i>छू</i>
      <par n="छू/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="उठ">
      <i>उठ</i>
      <par n="उठ/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सो">
      <i>सो</i>
      <par n="सो/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="से">
      <i>से</i>
      <par n="से/__future_ea" />
    </e>
    <e lm="खा">
      <i>खा</i>
      <par n="खा/__gerund_ba" />
    </e>
    <e lm="कर">
      <i>कर</i>
      <par n="कर/__gerund_ba" />
    </e>
    <e lm="उठ">
      <i>उठ</i>
      <par n="उठ/__gerund_ba" />
    </e>
    <e lm="हो">
      <i>हो</i>
      <par n="हो/__gerund_ba" />
    </e>
    <e lm="प">
      <i>प</i>
      <par n="प/ी__gerund_ba" />
    </e>
    <e lm="छ">
      <i>छ</i>
      <par n="छ/ू__gerund_ba" />
    </e>
    <e lm="सो">
      <i>सो</i>
      <par n="सो/__gerund_ba" />
    </e>
